District of Columbia statutes.
47-3704

Authority for Mayor to compromise tax.

In all cases in which the Mayor claims that a decedent was domiciled in the District at the time of his or her death and the taxing authorities of a state or states make a similar claim with respect to their state or states, the Mayor may compromise the taxes imposed by this chapter.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 5, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-3704.

Prior Codifications